Utah statutes.
58-63-306.   Replacement of qualifying agent.

If the qualifying agent of an armored car company or a contract security company ceases to perform the agent's duties on a regular basis, the licensee shall:

(1)  notify the division within 15 days by registered or certified mail; and

(2)  replace the qualifying agent within 60 days after the time required for notification to the division.



Amended by Chapter 246, 2008 General Session

